Utah statutes.
63B-11-201.   State Bonding Commission authorized to issue general
obligation bonds.
When the conditions established in Section 63B-11-202 are met, the commission
created under Section 63B-1-201 may issue and sell general obligation bonds of
the state pledging the full faith, credit, and resources of the state for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds to provide funds to the
division.
